Utah statutes.
53-7-204.   Duties of Utah Fire Prevention Board -- Unified Code Analysis
Council -- Local administrative duties.
(1)  The board shall:
(a)  administer the state fire code as the standard in the state;
(b)  subject to the state fire code, make rules in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:
(i)  establishing standards for the prevention of fire and for the protection
of life and property against fire and panic in any:
(A)  publicly owned building, including all public and private schools,
colleges, and university buildings;
(B)  building or structure used or intended for use as an asylum, a mental
hospital, a hospital, a sanitarium, a home for the elderly, an assisted living
facility, a children's home or day care center, or any building or structure
used for a similar purpose; or
(C)  place of assemblage where 50 or more persons may gather together in a
building, structure, tent, or room for the purpose of amusement,
entertainment, instruction, or education;
(ii)  establishing safety and other requirements for placement and discharge
of display fireworks on the basis of:
(A)  the state fire code; and
(B)  relevant publications of the National Fire Protection Association;
(iii)  establishing safety standards for retail storage, handling, and sale of
class C common state approved explosives;
(iv)  defining methods to establish proof of competence to place and discharge
display fireworks, special effects fireworks, and flame effects;
(v)  deputizing qualified persons to act as deputy fire marshals, and to
secure special services in emergencies;
(vi)  implementing Section 53-7-106;
(vii)  setting guidelines for use of funding;
(viii)  establishing criteria for training and safety equipment grants for
fire departments enrolled in firefighter certification; and
(ix)  establishing ongoing training standards for hazardous materials
emergency response agencies;
(c)  recommend to the commissioner a state fire marshal;
(d)  develop policies under which the state fire marshal and the state fire
marshal’s authorized representatives will perform;
(e)  provide for the employment of field assistants and other salaried
personnel as required;
(f)  prescribe the duties of the state fire marshal and the state fire
marshal’s authorized representatives;
(g)  establish a statewide fire prevention, fire education, and fire service
training program in cooperation with the Board of Regents;
(h)  establish a statewide fire statistics program for the purpose of
gathering fire data from all political subdivisions of the state;
(i)  establish a fire academy in accordance with Section 53-7-204.2;
(j)  coordinate the efforts of all people engaged in fire suppression in the
state;
(k)  work aggressively with the local political subdivisions to reduce fire
losses;
(l)  regulate the sale and servicing of portable fire extinguishers and
automatic fire suppression systems in the interest of safeguarding lives and
property;
(m)  establish a certification program for persons who inspect and test
automatic fire sprinkler systems;
(n)  establish a certification program for persons who inspect and test fire
alarm systems;
(o)  establish a certification for persons who provide response services
regarding hazardous materials emergencies;
(p)  in accordance with Section 53-7-106, report to the Business and Labor
Interim Committee; and
(q)  jointly create the Unified Code Analysis Council with the Uniform
Building Code Commission in accordance with Subsection 58-56-5(12).
(2)  The board may incorporate in its rules by reference, in whole or in part:
(a)  the state fire code; or
(b)  subject to the state fire code, a nationally recognized and readily
available standard pertaining to the protection of life and property from
fire, explosion, or panic.
(3)  The following functions shall be administered locally by a city, county,
or fire protection district:
(a)  issuing permits, including open burning permits pursuant to Sections
11-7-1 and 19-2-114;
(b)  creating a local board of appeals in accordance with the state fire code;
and
(c)  subject to the state fire code and the other provisions of this chapter,
establishing, modifying, or deleting fire flow and water supply requirements.
